North Carolina, session 2025, HB103.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 113-276(l1) reads as rewritten:
"(l1) The licensing provisions of this Article do not apply to a to:
(1) A member of an Indian tribe recognized under Chapter 71A of the General
Statutes for purposes of hunting, trapping, or fishing on tribal land. A person
taking advantage of this exemption shall possess and produce proper
identification confirming the person's membership in a State-recognized tribe
upon request by a wildlife enforcement officer. For purposes of this section,
"tribal land" means only real property owned by an Indian tribe recognized
under Chapter 71A of the General Statutes.
(2) A resident of the State who is a member of an Indian tribe recognized under
Chapter 71A of the General Statutes or who has an ID card from a Native
nation for purposes of hunting, trapping, or fishing in the State off tribal land.
A person taking advantage of this exemption shall possess and produce proper
identification confirming the person's membership in a State-recognized or
federally recognized tribe upon request by a wildlife enforcement officer. A
person exempted from licensing under this subdivision shall comply with (i)
all reporting requirements prescribed by statute or Wildlife Resources
Commission rule, (ii) the hunter education requirements set forth in
G.S. 113-270.1A, (iii) the requirements for purchase of federal migratory
waterfowl stamps, and (iv) any other requirements of law or rule to which
other North Carolina hunting and fishing license holders are subject. The
exemption from licensing provided under this subdivision shall not apply to
licenses issued under Article 14A, 14B, or 25A of this Chapter."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*H103-v-1*